Utah statutes.
13-1a-9.   Fees of Division of Corporations and Commercial Code.

In addition to the fees prescribed by Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, and Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act, the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code shall receive and determine fees pursuant to Section 63J-1-504 for filing articles of incorporation or amendments of insurance corporations, of canal or irrigation corporations organized for furnishing water to lands owned by the members thereof exclusively, or of water users' associations organized in conformity with the requirements of the United States under the Reclamation Act of June 17, 1902, and which are authorized to furnish water only to their stockholders.  No license fee may be imposed on insurance corporations, canal or irrigation corporations organized for furnishing water to lands owned by the members thereof exclusively, or water users' associations organized in conformity with the requirements of the United States under the Reclamation Act of June 17, 1902, and which are authorized to furnish water only to the stockholders at the time any such corporation files its articles of incorporation, articles of amendment increasing the number of authorized shares, or articles of merger or consolidation, any provision of Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act, to the contrary notwithstanding.

